North Dakota, session 69, HB1574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 38-08-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
38-08-21. Regulation of carbon dioxide and nitrogen gas.
1. The commission is vested with the authority and duty to regulate the exploration,
development, and production of carbon dioxide, coal bed methane gas, helium gas,
and nitrogen gas within the state, in the same manner, insofar as is practicable, as
itthe commission regulates oil or gas as defined in this chapter.
2. The commission may not approve or authorize a direct air carbon dioxide capture
project as defined under section 2 of this Act .
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 38-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Direct air carbon dioxide capture projects - Prohibition.
A person may not construct, implement, or operate a direct air carbon dioxide capture
project in this state. As used in this section, "direct air carbon dioxide capture" means the
process of removing carbon dioxide directly from the atmosphere by using scrubbers and
chemical processes for underground storage or use in products.
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. The prohibition under section 2 of this Act does not apply to
an operator of a direct air carbon dioxide capture project in possession of necessary local,
state, and federal permits and approvals before the effective date of this Act.
Page No. 1 25.0913.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 4. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through July 31, 2027, and after that
date is ineffective.
Page No. 2 25.0913.01000